Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.058

Election official.

"Election official" when pertaining to voter registration includes any staff member of the office of the secretary of state, staff of state agencies or offices providing voter registration services, or a staff member of a county auditor's office.

[ 2023 c 466 s 34; 2019 c 391 s 1.]